Washington statutes.
RCW 16.72.040

Branding—Recording.

The owners of any fox, mink, or marten may mark them by branding with tattoo or other marks for the purpose of identification, but no person shall be entitled to ownership in or rights under any particular branding marks unless and until the branding marks are recorded with the department in the same manner and with like effect as brands of other animals are recorded as provided in *chapter 16.56 RCW.

[ 1955 c 321 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 16.56 RCW was repealed by 1959 c 54 s 39. For later enactment, see chapter 16.57 RCW.